New York, session 2025-2026, A7844.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 23 of the town law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 38 to read as follows: 3 38. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision one of this section, 4 in the town of West Almond, in the county of Allegany, the person 5 performing the function of town justice, need not be an elector of such 6 town; provided that such person resides in the county of Allegany. 7 Provided, however, the person performing the function of town justice in 8 any other town shall be an elector of such town, unless otherwise 9 provided by an act of the state legislature. 10 § 2. Section 3 of the public officers law is amended by adding a new 11 subdivision 77 to read as follows: 12 77. In the town of West Almond, in the county of Allegany, the 13 provisions of this section requiring a person to be a resident of the 14 political subdivision or municipal corporation of the state for which 15 such person shall be chosen or within which such person's official func- 16 tions are required to be exercised, shall not prevent a person from 17 holding the office of town justice of the town of West Almond; provided 18 that such person resides in the county of Allegany. Provided, however, 19 the person performing the function of town justice in any other town 20 shall be a resident of such town, unless otherwise provided by law. 21 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09331-04-6